District of Columbia statutes.
16-1321

Abandonment of proceedings; liability.

In a condemnation proceeding pursuant to this subchapter, it is optional with the Mayor to abide by the verdict of the jury and occupy the property appraised by them, or, within a reasonable time to be fixed by the court in its order confirming the verdict, to abandon the proceeding. If the proceeding is abandoned, the court shall award to the owner or owners of the property involved therein such sum or sums as will in the opinion of the court reimburse the owner or owners for all reasonable costs and expenses, including reasonable counsel fees, incurred by him or them in the proceeding. The sum or sums so awarded constitute a judgment or judgments against the District of Columbia. An owner is not entitled to the reimbursement in any case where the proceeding is abandoned at the request, or with the consent, of the owner of the property.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 575, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 558, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(f)(7)
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 10(p), 45 DCR 745
Philadelphia, Baltimore, and Washington Railroad Company, acquisition authority, see § 9-1203.06.
Eminent domain, jurisdiction, see § 16-1303.
This section is referenced in § 7-1231.14.
1981 Ed., § 16-1321.
1973 Ed., § 16-1321.